dev/verb/verb.ne.dix
  <!-- जोड्; जोड; 3 -->
    <pardef n="जोड/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िए</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- होउ; होउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="होउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="fam"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दिं; दिं; 2 -->
    <pardef n="दिं__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भर्; भर; 4 -->
    <pardef n="भर/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िए</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गरिदिए; गरिदिए; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गरिदिए__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- थप; थप; 1 -->
    <pardef n="थप__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अनिद; अनिद; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अनिद__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दिइ; दिइ; 3 -->
    <pardef n="दिइ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रहे</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बुर्बुराउँ; बुर्बुराउँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बुर्बुराउँ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सम्झ्; सम्झ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="सम्झ/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाउँदा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्यौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रन्क; रन्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रन्क__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हेरि; हेरि; 2 -->
    <pardef n="हेरि__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रहे</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रहें</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दिए; दिए; 2 -->
    <pardef n="दिए__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ं</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पाइए; पाइए; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पाइए__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जनाउँ; जनाउँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जनाउँ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नसुहाउँ; नसुहाउँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नसुहाउँ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दि; दि; 3 -->
    <pardef n="दि__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उँ</l>
          <r><s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऊँ</l>
          <r><s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उन्</l>
          <r><s n="opt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दि; दि; 10 -->
    <pardef n="दि__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>यौ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नुहोस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pol"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नुस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pol"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>यो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पिट्ने; पिट्ने; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पिट्ने__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सकेनन्; सकेनन्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सकेनन्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तताउ; तताउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तताउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अस्ताउ; अस्ताउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अस्ताउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चाट; चाट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चाट__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="जोड्"><i>जोड</i><par n="जोड/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="होउ"><i>होउ</i><par n="होउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="दिं"><i>दिं</i><par n="दिं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भर्"><i>भर</i><par n="भर/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गरिदिए"><i>गरिदिए</i><par n="गरिदिए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="थप"><i>थप</i><par n="थप__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="अनिद"><i>अनिद</i><par n="अनिद__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="दिइ"><i>दिइ</i><par n="दिइ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बुर्बुराउँ"><i>बुर्बुराउँ</i><par n="बुर्बुराउँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सम्झ्"><i>सम्झ</i><par n="सम्झ/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="रन्क"><i>रन्क</i><par n="रन्क__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हेरि"><i>हेरि</i><par n="हेरि__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="दिए"><i>दिए</i><par n="दिए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पाइए"><i>पाइए</i><par n="पाइए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="जनाउँ"><i>जनाउँ</i><par n="जनाउँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="नसुहाउँ"><i>नसुहाउँ</i><par n="नसुहाउँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="दि"><i>दि</i><par n="दि__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="दि"><i>दि</i><par n="दि__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पिट्ने"><i>पिट्ने</i><par n="पिट्ने__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सकेनन्"><i>सकेनन्</i><par n="सकेनन्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="तताउ"><i>तताउ</i><par n="तताउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="अस्ताउ"><i>अस्ताउ</i><par n="अस्ताउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="चाट"><i>चाट</i><par n="चाट__vblex"/></e>
